District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.05

Effect of child-custody determination.

A child-custody determination made by a court of the District that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons who have been served in accordance with the laws of the District or notified in accordance with § 16-4601.07 or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court, and who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the determination is conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 106 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).